Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.500

Formation—Registration—Application—Registered agent—Fee.

(1) A partnership which is not a limited liability partnership on June 11, 1998, may become a limited liability partnership upon the approval of the terms and conditions upon which it becomes a limited liability partnership by the vote necessary to amend the partnership agreement except, in the case of a partnership agreement that expressly considers obligations to contribute to the partnership, the vote necessary to amend those provisions, and by delivering to the secretary of state for filing the applications required by subsection (2) of this section. A partnership which is a limited liability partnership on June 11, 1998, continues as a limited liability partnership under this chapter.

(2)(a) To become and to continue as a limited liability partnership, a partnership must deliver to the secretary of state for filing an application stating the name of the partnership; the address of its principal office; the name and address of a registered agent for service of process in this state which the partnership will be required to continuously maintain in accordance with Article 4 of chapter 23.95 RCW; the number of partners; a brief statement of the business in which the partnership engages; any other matters that the partnership determines to include; and that the partnership thereby applies for status as a limited liability partnership.

(b) A registered agent for service of process under (a) of this subsection may be any person authorized under Article 4 of chapter 23.95 RCW to serve as registered agent.

(3) The application must be accompanied by a fee for each partnership as established by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.260.

(4) The secretary of state must register as a limited liability partnership any partnership that submits a completed application with the required fee.

(5) A partnership registered under this section must pay an annual fee, in each year following the year in which its application is filed, on a date and in an amount specified by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.260. The fee must be accompanied by an annual report pursuant to RCW 23.95.255(2).

(6) Registration is effective as specified in RCW 23.95.210, and remains effective until:

(a) It is voluntarily withdrawn by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a written withdrawal notice executed by a majority of the partners or by one or more partners or other persons authorized to execute a withdrawal notice; or

(b) Thirty days after receipt by the partnership of a notice from the secretary of state, which notice must be sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, that the partnership has failed to make timely payment of the annual fee specified in subsection (5) of this section, unless the fee is paid within such a thirty-day period.

(7) The status of a partnership as a limited liability partnership, and the liability of the partners thereof, is not affected by: (a) Errors in the information stated in an application under subsection (2) of this section or a notice under subsection (6) of this section; or (b) changes after the filing of such an application or notice in the information stated in the application or notice.

[ 2017 c 31 s 5; 2015 c 176 s 5108; 2010 1st sp.s. c 29 s 5; 2009 c 437 s 4; 1998 c 103 s 1101.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 24.06.450.